Illinois, session 104th, SB1435.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The University of Illinois Hospital Act is 5amended by adding Section 6.8 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 330/6.8 new)7    Sec. 6.8. Panic buttons required. The University of 8Illinois Hospital shall ensure that all employees of the 9University of Illinois Hospital have a panic button attached 10to their staff identification card. 11    Section 10. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 12adding Section 7.7 as follows: 13    (210 ILCS 85/7.7 new)14    Sec. 7.7. Panic buttons required. A hospital shall ensure 15that all employees of the hospital have a panic button 16attached to their staff identification card. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182025.